Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1059.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; department of transportation; State Route 87 and State Route 260; additional right turn lane The sum of $9,200,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the department of transportation for costs associated with planning, designing, constructing and the acquisition of right-of-way or easements for an additional right turn lane at the intersection of State Route 87 and State Route 260.